Hawaii statutes.
ARTICLE
10E

PROPERTY
INSURANCE

PART I.
INSURABLE INTEREST IN PROPERTY;

OVER-INSURANCE

Note

Sections 431:10E-101 to 431:10E-103 designated as Part I by L
2012, c 80, §2.

§431:10E-101 Insurable interest in property
required. No contract of insurance on property or of any interest therein
or arising therefrom shall be enforceable except for the benefit of persons
having an insurable interest in the property insured. Insurable interest means
any lawful and substantial economic interest in the safety or preservation of
the subject of the insurance free from loss, destruction, or pecuniary damage.
[L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next